Vermont, session 2025-2026, H93.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. chapter 88 is added to read:
CHAPTER 88. VETERANS IN VERMONT
§ 1751. MAINTENANCE OF A DATABASE OF VETERANS IN
VERMONT
The Director of the Vermont Office of Veterans Affairs shall work with
other agencies, offices, and departments to develop and maintain a database of
veterans in Vermont. All agencies, offices, and departments shall, to the
maximum extent practicable and consistent with State and federal law, provide
information on veterans in Vermont to the Director of the Vermont Office of
Veterans Affairs. Any personally identifying information about veterans
collected for the database is exempt from public inspection and copying under
the Public Records Act and shall be kept confidential. Notwithstanding
1 V.S.A. § 371(e), the Public Records Act exemption created in this section
shall continue in effect and shall not be repealed through the operation of
1 V.S.A. § 317(e).
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379244 v.1